da: Type af kindstøtte: 3-rings gag; Baby fulmer; Baucher; Beval gag; Bridon; D-ring; Muffebid; Full cheek; Half cheek; Jagtbid; Løse ringe; O-ring; Pelham; Universal; Waterford-ring; Andet
zh-TW: 銜鐵頰環樣式: 3 環提水籠; Baby fulmer; 保雪 (Baucher); Beval 提水籠; 小勒; D 型環; 蛋型環; 全頰環; 半頰環; 金伯威克 (Kimberwick); 活動環; O 型環; 佩勒姆銜 (Pelham); 通用; 沃特福德環 (Waterford ring); 其他
zh-CN: 颊垫款式: 三环衔; 迷你富尔默衔; 鲍歇衔; 贝瓦尔衔; 勒缰小衔; D 形环; 蛋形环; 全颊衔; 半颊衔; 金伯威克衔; 活环; O 形环; 佩勒姆衔; 通用衔; 沃特福德环; 其他
sk-SK: Štýl lícnice: 3-krúžkové zubadlo; Zubadlo baby fulmer; Zubadlo baucher; Zubadlo beval; Stíhlové zubadlo; D-krúžok; Olivové zubadlo; Ramienkové zubadlo; Polovičné ramienkové zubadlo; Kimberwick; Voľný krúžok; O-krúžok; Pelham; Univerzálne; Krúžkové zubadlo waterford; Iné
fi: Poskikappaleen tyyli: 3-rengaskolmipala; Baby fulmer; Baucher; Beval-kuolain; Bradoon; D-rengas; Oliivikuolain; Varsi; Puolivarsi; Kimberwick; Vapaasti pyörivä rengas; O-rengas; Pelham; Universal; Waterford-rengas; Muu
ro-RO: Stilul zăbalei: Zăbală tip gag cu 3 inele; Baby fulmer; Baucher; Zăbală tip gag Beval; Bridoane; Inel D; Eggbutt; Brațe întregi; Jumătate de braț; Kimberwick; Inel mobil; Inel O; Pelham; Universal; Inel Waterford; Altele
pt-BR: Estilo das tiras da cabeçada/testeiras: Gag de 3 argolas; Baby fulmer; Baucher; Gag Beval; Brida; Argola em D; Argola fixa; Agulha; Meia agulha; Kimberwick; Argola solta; Argola em O; Pelham; Universal; Argola Waterford; Outro
tr: Yanaklık stili: 3 halkalı gag; Baby fulmer; Baucher; Beval gag; Bradoon; D halka; Eggbutt; Tam yanaklı; Yarım yanaklı; Kimberwick; Gevşek halka; O halka; Pelham; Evrensel; Waterford halkası; Diğer
fr: Style de branches de mors: Releveur 3 anneaux; Baby fulmer; Baucher; Releveur Beval; Bridoon; Anneau en D; Olive; À aiguilles; À demi-aiguilles; Kimberwick; Anneau libre; Anneau en O; Pelham; Universel; Anneau Waterford; Autre
bg-BG: Тип бузник: Трендзел с 3 пръстена; Бейби фулмер; Баучер; Бевал гаг; Брадун; D-образен пръстен; Егбът; С пълни рамена; С половин рамена; Кимбъруик; Свободен пръстен; О-образен пръстен; Пелам; Универсален; Уотърфорд пръстен; Други
pt-PT: Estilo de peça para as bochechas: Elevador de 3 argolas; Baby fulmer; Baucher; Elevador beval; Bridão; Argola em D; Oliva; Hastes completas; Meias hastes; Kimberwick; Argola solta; Argola em O; Pelham; Universal; Argola waterford; Outro
th: รูปแบบของห่วงแก้มบังเหียน: แก๊กแบบ 3 ห่วง; เบบี้ฟุลเมอร์; บาวเชอร์; แก๊กเบวัล; บราดูน; ห่วงตัว D; เอ้กบัตต์; ฟูลชีค; ฮาล์ฟชีค; คิมเบอร์วิค; ห่วงหลวม; ห่วงตัว O; เพลแฮม; อเนกประสงค์; ห่วงวอเตอร์ฟอร์ด; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип щечек: Пелям с тремя кольцами; Бэби фульмер; Баучер; Бевал (Beval); Брадун; D-образное кольцо; Империал; С усиками; С полуусиками; Кимбервик; Свободное кольцо; О-образное кольцо; Пелям; Универсальный; Кольцо Уотерфорда; Другое
hr-HR: Stil obraza: 3 prstena; Baby fulmer; Baucher; Beval; Bradoon; D-prsten; Maslinasta žvala; Pune igle; Pola igle; Kimblewick; Pomični prsten; O-prsten; Pelham; Univerzalno; Waterford prsten; Ostalo
vi: Kiểu má hàm: Gag 3 vòng; Baby fulmer; Baucher; Gag Beval; Bradoon; Vòng chữ D; Khớp hình trứng; Càng dài; Càng ngắn; Kimberwick; Vòng trượt; Vòng chữ O; Pelham; Đa năng; Vòng Waterford; Khác
es: Tipo de laterales de la embocadura: Elevador de 3 anillas; Fulmer pequeño; Baucher; Elevador Beval; Filete Bridoon; Anilla en D; Oliva; De palillos; De medios palillos; Kimberwick; Anilla suelta; Anilla en O; Pelham; Universal; Anilla Waterford; Otro
nb: Kinnstykke-stil: 3-ringsbitt; Baby fulmer; Baucher; Beval-gag; Bridon; D-ring; Muffebitt; Parerstenger; Halve parerstenger; Jaktkandarbitt; Løse ringer; O-ring; Pelham; Universalbitt; Waterford-ring; Annet
lt-LT: Skruosto atramos stilius: „Gag“ su 3 žiedais; „Baby Fulmer“; „Baucher“; „Beval gag“; Bradūno tipo; D formos žiedai; Alyvuogės formos žiedai; Su ilgais ūsais; Su pusiniais ūsais; „Kimberwick“; Laisvi žiedai; O formos žiedai; Pelhamo tipo; Universalus; „Waterford“ žiedas; Kita
de: Art des Wangenstücks: 3-Ring-Aufziehtrense; Baby-Fulmer-Trense; Baucher-Trense; Beval-Trense; Unterlegtrense; D-Ring; Olivenkopf; Schenkeltrense; Halbe Schenkeltrense; Springkandare; Wassertrense; O-Ring; Pelham; Universal; Waterford-Trense; Sonstiges
cs: Styl lícnice: Tříkroužkový gag; Baby fulmer; Baucher; Beval gag; Bradoon; Déčko; Oliva; Ramínkové; Poloviční ramínkové; Kimberwick; Stihlové kroužky; O-kroužek; Pelham; Univerzální; Řetízkové kroužky (Waterford); Jiné
ja: チークピーススタイル: 3リングギャグ; ベビーフルマー; ボーチェ; ベヴァルギャグ; ブラドーン; Dリング; エッグバット; フルチーク; ハーフチーク; キンバーウィック; ルーズリング; Oリング; ぺラム; ユニバーサル; ウォーターフォードリング; その他
pl: Styl wędzidła zwykłego: Wielokrążek 3-pierścieniowy (gag); Wąsate Baby Fulmer; Wędzidło Baucher; Wędzidło Beval; Wędzidełko munsztukowe; Wędzidło D-Ring; Oliwkowe; Wąsate (Full cheek); Półwąsate; Pelham angielski (Kimblewick); Zwykłe z ruchomymi kółkami; Wędzidło O-Ring; Pelham; Uniwersalny; Koralikowe (Waterford); Inny
nl: Bitringstijl: 3-ringentrens; Kleine kneveltrens; Bauchertrens; Bevaltrens; Onderlegtrens; D-trens; Bustrens; Kneveltrens; Halve kneveltrens; Kimblewick; Watertrens; O-ring; Pelham; Universeel; Waterford-trens; Overig
it: Stile guanciale: Elevatore a 3 anelli; Baby fulmer; Baucher; Elevatore Beval; Bradoon; Anello a D; A oliva; Ad aste; A mezza asta; Kimberwick; Ad anelli scorrevoli; O-ring; Pelham; Universale; Anello Waterford; Altro
sv: Kindbettsstil: 3-ringsbett; Baby fulmer; Baucher; Beval-bett; Bridong; D-ring; Eggbett; Parerstänger; Halva parerstänger; Jaktkandar; Lösa ringar; O-ring; Pelham; Universal; Waterford-ring; Övrigt
ko: 뺨받이 유형: 3링 개그; 베이비 풀머; 바우처; 비발 개그; 브라둔; D링; 에그벗; 풀 치크; 하프 치크; 킴벌윅; 루즈 링; O링; 펠햄; 유니버설; 워터포드 링; 기타
sl-SI: Slog ličnikov: 3-obročni gag; Baby fulmer; Baucher; Gag Beval; Bradoon; D-obroč; Eggbutt; Polni lici; Polovični lici; Kimberwick; Premični obroč; O-obroč; Pelham; Univerzalno; Obroč Waterford; Drugo
el: Τύπος μάγουλου: Γκαγκ 3 κρίκων; Μικρό φούλμερ (Baby fulmer); Μπάουτσερ (Baucher); Γκαγκ Μπεβάλ (Beval gag); Μπραντούν (Bradoon); Κρίκος D (D-ring); Έγκμπατ (Eggbutt); Ολόκληρο μάγουλο; Μισό μάγουλο; Κίμπεργουικ (Kimberwick); Χαλαρός κρίκος; Κρίκος O (O-ring); Πέλαμ (Pelham); Ουνιβερσάλ (Universal); Κρίκος Γουότερφορντ (Waterford ring); Άλλο
en: Cheekpiece style: 3-ring gag; Baby fulmer; Baucher; Beval gag; Bradoon; D-ring; Eggbutt; Full cheek; Half cheek; Kimberwick; Loose ring; O-ring; Pelham; Universal; Waterford ring; Other
hu: Pofarész stílusa: 3 karikás pálcás zabla; Baba fulmer zabla; Baucher; Beval zabla; Csikózabla (Bradoon); D-karikás; Oliv; Pálcás; Félpálcás; Kimblewick; Csikó (mozgó karikás); O-karikás; Pelham; Univerzális; Waterford karikás; Egyéb